Utah statutes.
6-1-8.   Objections to claims -- Hearing.

Any person interested may appear within one month after such report is filed and contest the claim or demand of any creditor by written exceptions thereto filed with the clerk, who shall forthwith cause notice thereof to be given to the creditor, which shall be served as in case of a summons and returnable at a time to be named therein, not less than 10 nor more than 40 days; at which time the court shall proceed to hear the proofs and allegations of the parties in the matter and render such judgment thereon as shall be just.

